I have been coming here for at least 10 years and I love this place! Every time I'm in Stanford Shopping Center I make sure to stop by. My favorite things on the menu are: crab cakes, prawn salad, seafood in puff pastry and of course the dover sole! First of all the crab cakes that they make here are absolutely fantastic. I'm a big fan of crab cakes and am very picky, but this is the perfect size. The main dish comes with 2 small ones that you can actually finish on your own and with a pepper sauce that ties it perfectly together. The prawn salad is perfect if you want to share for a light lunch or for a healthy meal. It is separated into prawns, avocado, black beans, corn and salad. My dad always gets the dover sole. It's light and the portion is a pretty big one. So if you are hungry and are still going for something healthy this would be your dish. The last one is the seafood puff pastry which I eat on the days which I'm just ready forget about my diet needs. It comes baked with different seafood inside. I wouldn't say it's very heavy but not on the lighter side. I have to mention that this restaurant is not cheap so, but with the size that you get is worth it. I'm not sure why there are so many mixed reviews here. In my opinion if you don't want to go to an expensive restaurant then don't go. Why would you give someone a low rating if you can't afford it or just don't want to pay.... Enjoy! Can't wait to be back here again!
I ate here once with my mom about a year ago, and we decided to return with my family and boyfriend for Sunday lunch. Most AWKWARD experience Everything is very overpriced (around $20 for a pasta dish and $15 for two tiny crab cakes, etc.), although some dishes are pretty tasty. The crab cakes and the creamy orange sauce are delicious. The fish entrees are also very good (the sauces are very flavorful). The pasta...is alright. I like how it's cooked nicely al dente, but the broths could use a LOT more flavor. One of the things I remembered from last time was the complimentary focaccia bread being quite good - and it still is - although today it was STALE which was disappointing. The owner...is extremely bizarre and I'm not quite sure what his intentions are, but he just comes off as excessively disrespectful. First, while we were waiting for our food, my dad got a call from my aunt on his cell and had a short conversation on the phone. The owner walked by during the call and said "he's just like a teenager!" --- what a nervy comment. When our food arrived, my boyfriend started to put some black pepper on his pasta from the pepper shaker on the table. The owner walked over, TOOK the pepper out of his hand, and said "we don't do that here, these [the salt and pepper shakers] are for decoration only." Later when my boyfriend asked for a box to take the rest of his pasta home, the owner was like "you want a BOX..." starts laughing mockingly..."was that your second pasta?" Everything that came out of his mouth was beyond rude and it was borderline funny because it was just so unbelievable! He succeeded in making us just want to get the eff out of there as soon as possible away from his cray cray ass. And why does he come over to the table and just STAND there staring at everyone  for stretches of time without saying anything and then walking away?...
$15 for a sandwich?! Maybe if it was the best ever! And  if it was accompanied by some fantastic side, but alas, that was not what I experienced at Babbo's at all . I went to Babbo's for lunch with my boyfriend and we decided to split a sandwich when we saw the prices on the menu. We each order an iced tea(which never got refilled) and a Focaccia Liguria. A  grilled spicy chicken sandwich. All the while the owner was sort of hovering around our table trying to start a conversation with us..Awkward! When our order came what arrived was an open faced foccaccia, of a sort, with a thin strip if chicken on top of 2 slices of  a toasted bun. In the center of the plate were 4 tomato slices, some grated carrots and some watercress sprigs all for US to put on the sandwich ourselves! Nothing else on the plate! Just the sandwich! Which , by the way, was not spicy in the least. It wasn't a bad sandwich, just nothing special and certainly not worth $15! When we got the bill the grand total for lunch for 2, who shared 1 entree, was $25! I say skip Babbo's and head for the $8 baguette sandwich at La baguette!
i went here long time ago but there is a real reason why i quit going here. i dont mind the food . but the owner he charges you extra for refills. The food was good but other than that be carefull when you order a soda and want a refill. if i knew back then i wouldnt order a soda i would have order water. ps i am still surprise this place is still open. ps. becarefull of ordering refill he doesnt put that on the menu as disclaimer
The hubs took me here for a post-Valentine's dinner. We ordered a pizza to share for appetizer...too big for an appetizer, but good. I forgot what kind we ordered. Sorry. For the entree I had the seafood puff pastry. It was pretty good. I don't remember what the hubs ordered, but it was pretty good. It's a bit pricey. Service was good, place is small...pretty tight...but they were very accomodating when we came in with our stroller. Not sure if I'd come back though.
My friend and I decided to stop into Babbo's before hitting the road back home. A pricey establishment hiding behind a little cafe veneer. There wasn't a menu posted (which is very strategic of them), so we figured we'd go in and grab a few slices of pizza and a salad.  When I opened the menu, I was rather surprised by the high prices for such a no-frills place. Sandwiches were around $16 and entrees were upwards of $20. I'm aware that it is located at the Stanford Shopping Center but I receive a better overall experience at Pizza My Heart, which is a cheap in-and-out pizza joint. My Margherita Pizza was pretty good. Served nice and hot from their wood-fired oven with a host of flavors. My friend had the Eggplant & Goat Cheese Sandwich. The eggplant was a little bitter but brightened up with hunks of creamy goat cheese. Portions are decent -- she had enough to take half of her sandwich home. While all the food was pretty good, $50 for a pizza and a sandwich (with water) wasn't quite what we had in mind. Our server was a nice older man but he couldn't keep pace with the volume of restaurant patrons (which was three tables btw). Suffice it to say, his presense was very scarce. I'm not saying I'll never go back in but I'm not really jumping to return.
It's listed as a pizzeria in the mall's directory, but the name says it's a bistro.  Either way, it also has nothing to do with Babbo in NY.  Perhaps I should have tried their pizza given the name.  Instead, I had a mediocre seafood puff pastry for $25 that was priced twice what it's worth even with scallops, prawns and mushrooms in a strong sherry wine sauce. Service is fast and friendly.  The ambiance and decor has nothing special worth noting especially outside with the awkward seating.  Parking is tough in the lot since it's usually packed.
Our lunch here during the shopping spree yesterday was pleasant and enjoyable. We were warmly greeted by the waiter upon entering; the aroma of Mediterranean food made us really hungry. We walked by the open kitchen and were seated at the end of the half full dinning area. The waiter was very friendly and accommodating, the focaccia was served promptly, an elderly gentlemen (owner?) came by the table to chat with us as well. For four of us,  we shared : Mussels - good flavor and fresh ingredients, portion was slightly smaller then average but enough to share. The pizza Babbo - flat bread with feta cheese and olives, very salty, a bit soggy, just average at best. Paella - decent amount of prawns (6) as well as chicken, sausages, some clams and mussels. Pretty tasty and enough to share. Fillet of sole over spinach and asparagus - tasty and well cooked. Portion of the fish can be a bit more generous. Three of us had coffee which were refilled frequently; we sat for quite a while and was not rushed. The bill came to $96 before tips which was on the pricey side. The overall experience was OK/good but not fantastic; including consideration of the convenience factor.
Very poor service!!!!!  I went in to ask for a table while my family waited outside.  It was a hot day so my family saw an empty table and sat there to be under the shade.  The host came out and asked for now many and I said 4.  He said where's the rest of your group and I pointed outside and he sees them sitting on the table.  He said you can't just take a table like that, we're so busy.  Really???? There were no other people waiting.  I explained to him i understand and they're just sitting there to get some shade.   He wouldn't listen and kept rambling on how you can't do this or that.  Unbelievable!!!  At the end of his non-sense rambles, they give the same table.  What a joke!  We left and went to a more FRIENDLIER and PROFESSIONAL establishment.
Sat outside on a Saturday for lunch.  The menu has a nice selection - I chose the prawn salad which sounded way better than it actually was. The bread is YUM. The service was very warm and friendly.  I would go back and try something else.
My boyfriend and I ended up at the Stanford Shopping Center the other day because of the BOGO Facebook coupon for Sprinkles cupcakes, and since it was around dinner time, we decided to eat dinner at the shopping center instead of driving around and finding a new place to try. We ended up going to Babbo's since it was the closest restaurant (yes, we can be VERY lazy sometimes) to Sprinkles. We were seated very quickly but it was at a very awkwardly positioned table next to one of the columns in the restaurant. My boyfriend barely had room to move around since there was another table right next to us, so that was kind of annoying (you can see it in one of the pictures on Yelp). The waiter, however, was very friend and service was very speedy throughout the whole meal. I ended up ordering their penne pasta while my boyfriend had one of their pizzas (can't remember which one right now). In all honesty, I thought the meal was just okay because I don't remember much of it even though we JUST had it not too long ago. Their bread, however, was very delicious!!!!! It's home-made (supposedly) and full of flavor - although I had to ask for it because they totally forgot to serve us bread... I have to complain about their bathroom system because there is a sign about having to use a key (which I almost missed except for the fact that I actually paid attention before I opened the door to go out back for the bathroom). However, when I tried to go to the bathroom, it was apparently locked...and then when I tried to force open the door, another person actually was trying to get out of the bathroom!!!!! (I guess he missed the sign on the door about the key & the door just happened to be unlocked so he was inside taking care of his business while I had the key outside ready to unlock the door...) That was quite unacceptable...it made me super paranoid the whole time I was in the bathroom because I thought someone else would now try and open the door on me while I'm on the toilet!
What a fantastic surprise! I had a simple prawn salad that was so reminiscent of meals I've had at little outdoor trattorias in Italy that for a moment, I forgot I was sitting inside the Stanford Mall. This place is a definite must visit on your next trip to the mall. Sit outside under an umbrella and watch the people walk by while you nosh on the most delicious Mediterranean fare in the bay area, prepared with great skill using the freshest of ingredients. Cannot wait to go back.
This place was massively disappointing.  All I wanted was a simple chicken sandwich.  Nothing fancy, and nothing outrageously priced. (I know, I know, you're saying then why were you at Stanford Shopping Center in the first place?!) I ordered the Foccacia Liguria, which apparently means foccacia chicken sandwich.  I did have my hopes up, as I do like foccacia bread, and as you walk into the dining room part of the restaurant you can see all the different types of foccacia breads lined up ready to be made into sandwiches.  What I didn't put together was the fact that most of those breads had probably been there a while.  I got the sandwich and the first thing i noticed was that the foccacia was stale.  Foccacia is supposed to be a little chewy, this was just stale.  And since it was a thick piece of foccacia it made for a very VERY dry sandwich. The  chicken itself looked tasty enough, though the portion in between the giant pieces of stale foccacia could be measured in millimeters.  It had grill marks though, so bonus points for that.  The sandwich came with a watery honey mustard sauce which it desperately needed, though it didn't really add too much to the meal. I didn't finish the sandwich.  This place is apparently known for their pizzas, so maybe I'll give it another shot and order something different.  On the plus side the atmosphere was really nice, and the owner, Babbo himself, came to our table to regale us with his childhood stories from Hungary.  Yeah.
I could enjoy this restaurant! I tried Smoked Salmon Appetizer : just good. Tuna Crilled Nicoise : was awesome. Seafood puff pastry looks very good. It was little noisy to have good conversation. Standford shopping center is always pleasure place to go.
Well, it's in a mall, so take that for what it is. Walking in at 6pm on a Saturday, the place was fairly empty so we could choose a table inside or outside. The waitstaff was pretty nice, although they seemed somewhat understaffed, which ultimately resulted in spotty service (no water refills, forgot things we asked for). The space is somewhere between tired and interesting. The food: 1) Appetizers: - Baked goat cheese with crostini on salad. Baked goat cheese came out on a huge bed of mixed greens and butter lettuce, but the salad was barely dressed. The crostini with tapenade didn't really add much. - Smoked salmon. A generous platter of smoked salmon topped with capers and sliced red onions, served with toasted pita bread. Actually quite tasty. - Caesar salad with anchovies. Sorry, but much like the iceberg "wedge", I don't really like it when they don't at least chop the lettuce. Leaves of romaine topped with shaved parmesan and a few strips of anchovies. A little dry. - Flatbread pizza. Topped with roasted artichokes, prosciutto, and some other stuff. Pretty good. 2) Entrees: - Spaghetti and meatballs. Since when did spaghetti and meatballs come out greasy? The meatballs were overcooked and the sauce was a little off. - Paella. Very generous with the seafood, the rice was pretty well cooked in a small paella pan, but overall, everything was overcooked! The nice, large shrimp were almost rubbery and definitely dry. The mussels and clams were barely detectable in their shells, and there were at least a few with sand in them. The biggest pieces of meat in the dish was the chicken. - Also had salmon filet and prawn salad, but didn't get to try them. Cabernet from Peju winery in Napa. Been to the winery, not a big fan of the wine. Eh.
Charming place on the outside, but horrible customer service.  It is particularly bad when the Owner treats his patrons purely. It's difficult to get a table outside in this place...  A couple of weeks ago on a sunny beautiful day strolling through Babbo's i saw an empty table for two.  I asked a water to reserve it for me, i needed to use the restroom first.  When i was back in 5 min., the owner was sitting a couple at my 'reserved' table.  I told him that the table was reserved for me, but the owner quickly dismissed me by saying there will be "soon" another table ready for me.  I pointed to the table for four which was not taken if i can be seated there.  The owner said he would rather give it to a party of four (so he was not going to please me in any way! even though he gave my table away).  I waited for another 10 min, but the promised table for two still was not ready since the couple was chatting. So i left... And the table for four was still unoccupied...Bye-bye Babbo's, you won't see me again! I don't remember if i was treated more rudely in a restaurant in my life especially by the OWNER!
I've always walked past this place with the charming outdoor seating and checked it out after a shopping date with a girlfriend. We opened the menu and were a little unprepared for their prices, but decided to give it a try.  We decided to split a pizza (goat cheese, olives, tomatoes), and their prawn salad (grilled prawns, corn, avocado, and black beans).  Their prawn salad was delicious.  Pizza was good, but not great.  Especially for me after coming off of a super memorable meal at flour+water the weekend before. Our waiter was friendly, and it was a nice summer night out, so enjoyed my friend's company the most. It's a nice dinner option, but think overall their prices skew on the high side.
Wednesday @ noon. Lunch w/ 8 co-workers. Made reservation the day before. There were plenty of seating even without a reservation. Several typos on the menu, but that's rather common with restaurants, so I don't care THAT much. I think they should care though... Can't take them seriously if there are too many typos. Took over 10 minutes to get water service, after I said out loud "I AM SO THIRSTY!" Some of us got entrees (mostly fish), some of us got focaccia sandwiches, and I shared a caesar salad w/ prawns and a peperonata pizza with someone. I think the ones who got focaccia sandwiches were pleasantly surprised and they would eat it again. For me, the whole leaf romaine caesar salad swam in a yellow/white dressing with a blanket of parmigiano and two tails of anchovies on top. The pizza was floppy. They proudly display the pizza oven at the entrance of the restaurant, so I was expecting a crispy thin crust made to perfection, but it was almost too sad to eat the pizza when I had to hold its tip up from falling into despair... at least when it flopped down, the grease would leave its host and lighten up the load a little bit. $17.95 for the caesar salad and $15.95 for the pizza. With tip, it ended up being $32.65/person (not everyone got desserts/coffee). That's a bit pricey for a quick lunch, I thought.
YUCK! I guess that's what I get for following my instincts when I'm starving. I would have rather ate next door at the coffee shop or even across the way and grabbed some fruit rather than eat here. My first impression was it was empty yet there were a few reserved signs, is this a joke? Maybe they needed the place to look appealing? I liked that it was empty but should have taken the hint. I was really disappointed to discover that they didn't have a pesto dish or gnocchi :-( Everything else sounded so saucey and a little greasy, so I found my favorite type of salad; greens with fruit, cheese and nuts. A few minutes after we ordered a confused server tried to give us another tables' food, apologized and told us our food was on its way. I should hope so, I mean we ordered 2 minutes ago... Our server came with foccacia, another favorite of mine, but managed to drop a piece on me :-( Good thing I had my napkin covering, no crumbs! But still "my bad" is not an apology... We got our food and my bf's pizza was so odd looking, the toppings were all separated! 1/3 proscuitto, 1/3 olives and 1/3  mushroom. REALLY?! As for my salad, it was ok, the walnuts were covered in honey and stuck to my teeth, it was hard to eat. The greens were also soaked in balsamic dressing, I like a minimal amount of dressing so that kinda sucked. My fresh lemonade was probably the best thing at the restuarant, its unsweetened and they only had equal, would have been so much better with splenda. Oh well... I now know better. The only word I can use to sum up my experience is CARELESS. Seriously, there's a mcdonald's at stanford mall for a reason...
We came here while shopping at the mall. Service was prompt, but keep in mind that it's a long wait to get a table outside. We sat inside, and it's perfectly cute on the inside. It tries to give this vibe of old Europe, but I honestly think Cocola next door better achieves that. Service was okay -- nothing to brag about. They don't do half-sizes of risotto, so that kind of stunk, because my husband and I wanted to also get some other items. Anyway, here's what we had: 1. Four Seasons Pizza: There's 8 slices of pizza total with each season being reprsented by two slices. The whole pizza wasn't very big, it was about the size of a dinner plate? Totally doable by one person who's really hungry. I'm not sure which slices represented which seasons, but we had the following toppings on top of our standard cheese and tomato sauce: Prosciutto and capers: I like fresh prosciutto better, but this is pretty good. The capers add a freshness that my husband thought was really tasty. Mushroom: Really good -- tons of mushrooms all over the pizza Anchovy and onion: I loved it, but this was my husband's first time trying anchovies on pizza, and he was pretty scarred. Hahaha. Grilled marinated artichokes: Tasty but the artichokes taste too overly vinegar-y, maybe they were in vinegar before? 2. Mushroom risotto: Not creamy enough but pretty tasty. I love that it's completely vegetarian, because most risottos have chicken stock in them and vegetarian people can't eat them. Not sure if we're coming back. It seemed rather overpriced for the quality of food.
So-so. Valdostana Pizza - good Focaccia Babbo - a bit dry, very average tasting Lamb Shank - juicy and tender, but the flavor was a bit overpowering.
After today's lunch here, it'll be a while before i go out to eat without checking with Yelp first. This place is a huge rape, ripoff, whatever you want to call it. It is a casual place, nothing extraordinary or special, however, How could  you justify a $18 Chicken Sandwich, $9.50 for a CUP of SOUP, $22 seafood pasta....   etc.? Food is nothing special. Lots of hits and misses. It is an open kitchen and everything is prepared by hispanic cooks (wink wink). Bread was stale, my wife;s chicken on stale focaccia was terrible, my tuna steak was ok, $29 Lamb chops was good. The only reason we didn't walk out was not to embarrass our guest out of town. What a shame. AVOID
There is an older gentelman who works there on Sunday afternoon.   He may even be an owner.  I had lunch there with my wife, father, and Uncle. Our bill was $105 and I tipped 20% out of habit but this person made several inappropriate comments to us throughout our meal which I will not post on Yelp.  I have gone there with my family for years but after that experience I will never go back. As far as the food, it is just fine.  You can't really mess up Pepperoni pizza and Chicken Marsala and they taste just ok when you are getting insulted by the older gentleman who works there between courses.  He ruined the experience for me and the repeat business for the other servers who are actually decent.  My father, uncle, and wife felt the same way about the experience.  Next April when my Grandfather is in town and takes the family to this place, I will make sure "NOT" to attend. As for my credibility for what it is worth, I have clients in Palo Alto who I often take to lunch and dinner around Stanford and so I dine out frequently for business and leisure.  I always tip 20% for a good dining experience.   I will not bring my business meetings to this restaurant and I sadly I would never dine here for leisure again.
Always read Yelp reviews before dining out. I should have followed my own advice to avoid this place. What a consistently horrible experience. We sat for 10 minutes before the waiter handed us a menu. Then another 15 minutes before our order went in.  45 minutes after arriving our cold and tasteless pizza arrived. My Caesar salad was limp and soggy; the dressing consisted of a cup of a salt and a blob of mayo.  I was so thirsty I asked for a refill of the watery iced tea and found later they charge for refills. My companion had a glass of wine for $9.50 that he left untouched as it was undrinkable. The bill came to $65 for horrid pizza and a salty salad. This place only survives because people don't want to wait for a table at Max's Opera Cafe.
Why anyone would eat at Babbo's when there are other dining options at Stanford Shopping Center baffles me. I only had lunch here because my companion was mesmerized by their sandwich selection. While his Chicken Foccacia sandwich was good, it was definitely not special enough for the ridiculous $14 price tag. The $10 Baked Goat Cheese salad was presented on a huge lettuce-lined platter to mimic the shape of a bowl. It was a good idea in theory, but a pain in the ass to cut into bite-size pieces. Although the dish was hard to eat, I enjoyed the croutons with goat cheese and olive spread. Skip Babbo's and go to the slightly more affordable Cocola next door.
Babbo NYC it is not, but Babbo SSC provides consistently good Italian fare in a cosy setting.  The outdoor patio is wonderful on a nice day and the wait staff is always so friendly I want to hug it. I've been a handful of times and have tried most of the pastas.  They've all been tasty, but the spinach tortellini in creamy sauce is great.  This is coming from a marinara maniac - I stray from my preferences for that tortellini.  Also worth noting is the smoked salmon appetizer that comes with the standard Lox accompaniments on flat bread.  For dessert try the lemon tart.  Yum num num.
The place seems very busy, and there are tons of waiters there (sunday). They even pull out the table to seat you and push back the table, and push in the chair as you are seated. how nice! The prices are reasonable, around $15 a plate of pasta. The penne ... bolognese was very delicous! It had a creamy tomato sauce that wasn't overpowering. The penne was cooked to prefection. While the bolognese wasn't too salty (unlike the ones at pasta pomodoro) The only thing i dont like is how close the seating is to one another, not very private for conversations.
Pretty mediocre all around.  I have come here several times and although I never really count the experience as anything remarkable.  I always return, but it is never my choice. The most stunning thing on the menu is this honey-mustard sauce that is addicting.
My favorite place to eat handsdown. You are warm welcomed by the staff here. I go to this place alot. The staff knows what I want to order when I walk through the door. Yes that is how much I come to this place. I always order the pene pasta dish that has tomato cream sauce with basil and italian sausage with focaccia bread SOOOOOOOO GOOOOOOOODD.  The pizzas are baked in a brick oven giving the crust awesome flavor. They have a full bar there mostly wine which I love. They have paella also and roasted chicken also. The decor is somewhat modern with an old world charm feel. You can set outside or inside. This place is not big somewhat on a small side. But the food and service speaks volumes. Somewhat pricey but at the end it is worth it trust me. Love this place to the people who complain that it's expensive. Umm FYI you are in a rich high class community near by Standford College. So get with the program take you're business somewhere else. Stop putting bad reviews because of it. So get a life.
First off I'm going with A-ok... ready for some confusion? The food was whatever and our main server was overly forgetful, causing my food to be sent back for corrections. This was a return visit for my guest who has had mostly great experiences here (foood/service). This was my first visit and not my last... for some strange reason... I have yet to put my finger on it. We'll start from the outside. Just after walking past fresh produce out front of a great Italian market, you almost walk strait into the BABBO'S patio seating. Blue and white table cloths on a clean patio... ooh inviting. And to top it off a little old couple out front was slowly making the rounds when the fella says to me "you looking for some good lunch? Come on in". Even more inviting now.... charming inside and out, cute little open kitchen (I try to get a good look, always), and the menu wasn't looking bad at all.  I was really diggin the place. Service was fine except the server lack of attention to detail. He made an upsell, forgot to send it in, and questions me when I questioned him. "Yes I want the cheese goo.... you offered it man, don't say I forgot to mention it"... kind of a lame deal. Anyhow after getting my food back we went onward devouring what was in front of us. And then I asked why. Oh yea because I was starving. That's it. I'm not one to complain about a pricey menu but I feel confident with my restaurant/menu/food knowledge and I have to let it spill here. I have no prroblem paying $20 for a burger, not at all. Just make sure its prime beef and God damn delicious. This was a giant onion foccacia roll with an average patty (say 7oz.-ish) and typical produce, no side included totaling to a $17 cheese burger. For that price I would have walked around to Flemings prime steakhouse (same shopping center) and had a delicious burger there. Too bad they didn't open for a few more hours. The ahi salad was more like and ahi-slaw-soup-thing.... after all the charm and welcoming arms.... I say what for. If I wanted to see nice old people and what not id be elsewhere. Shmee... you get the picture. Although the truth is ill be back. I don't know what it is, why it is, but I must return. I'm not done investigating this one.
I wasn't going to review this because I haven't been back in a while due to my decision to boycott it, but it seems things haven't changed much and my review would still be relevant. I remember it as if it were yesterday. We were a group of 6, the only customers in the restaurant. You'd think with 3 waiters we'd get good service. Not so. Each stage of the meal took FOREVER, from the water to the bringing of the food (lukewarm) to the dessert (MELTED ICE CREAM) to the check. How I regret being young and timid. If this happened now, you can bet they would've known my dissatisfaction and gotten no tip. But I secretly got my revenge by not going there and telling everyone to do the same. Oh yeah, and it's overpriced.
After some window shopping at Cartier and picking up some non-grandma undies from Victoria's Secret, BF and I stopped by Babbo's for a quick bite. We shared a greek salad and a lamb focaccia sandwich. Both were decent. Not out of this world but good for lunch. Sit outside, grab a glass of wine and enjoy the food. Check out the supermarket right across the way too. Great organic items and loads of dried fruit.
Loved this place! Super chic and conveniently located at the beautiful pedestrian Standford Mall.  What's not to love, right?  This quaint little cafe has adorable outdoor seating that resembles a true Italian cafe. The menu has an asortment of unique apps, focassia sandwishes, soups, salads, pizzas, pastas, seafood, and rotisserie. Their wine selection is pretty inviting and you won't realize you're getting buzzed cause it's just that good. This is a great place, and I highly recommend it!
Definitely better than most mall restaurants.  I think under normal circumstances I would rate Babbo's as 3-stars for a few reasons.  The food is fresh and very good, but I've had some dry chicken sandwiches, and some fish dishes that were so drenched in butter that you couldn't taste the fish.  The restaurant is also very cramped and does not have its own bathroom.  You have to walk into a service hallway for the mall to use the bathroom. The reason that I give Babbo's a 4-star review however, is the owner, Lazlo Fono.  He's an ex olympic skier who is quite old and a bit frail these days.  Yet you'll still find him at the restaurant, chatting with the customers quite frequently.  If you find a hard to understand old guy trying to make conversation with you at Babbo's, give him a chance and you'll discover he's a fantastic person with a rich history.  Even to this day he travels the world and skis in countries I can only dream of skiing in.  Cheers to Lazlo Fono!
The food was pretty standard fare, but it was overpriced. If you are going to spend $13 on a cup of soup, it better be one of the best soups ever! It sadly wasn't. Business must be good due to all the shoppers who get sucked into Babbo's just from passing by and looking at the quaint checkered tablecloths! Save your money and go to the California Pizza Kitchen ASAP instead.
Food:okay Service: very poor! Knowing I was at the "mall" and not expecting much from a mall restaurant I was not disappointed by the average food. Both mine and my companions separate fish dishes were very heavy on the butter but the fish was fresh and the vegetable side of tomato and Zucchini was delicious. The actual restaurant was empty on the inside as it was a lovely day and most diners were outside. Not wanting to wait we agreed to sit indoors....in an empty restaurant we were seated at the Bathroom entrance!  In addition, the bathroom was filthy. Our waiter continued to rush us through our order....coming to the table every 2 minutes to ask if we were ready to order, hardly giving us a chance to read the menu.(never mind him describing the specials or offering advice). Once we ordered......he was no where to be seen. We were not offered bread like other diners until we asked. Then we were brought bread without bread plates or olive oil. (again we had to ask).  The waiter never refilled our champagne glasses so we poured our own.....as we watched the parade of people go in and out of the bathroom. Overpriced and not worth a return visit!
Went here with my lunch buddy-two females who eat out often. In a nutshell: food was great but overpriced and the service was spotty. Mr. Waiter could not bring himself to smile or be overly friendly. We were not offered refills on drinks, empty glasses were not removed, we were offered tepid tea and my knife which was removed with my salad was not replaced with my pizza. I replaced it myself by taking one from the empty table next to us. All in all, won't be back soon. Oh yeah-do not under any circumstances use the bathroom facilities....yaaack! Also thought that the warning at the bottom of the menu about a $10 per person minimum was tacky.
Beautiful day in Palo Alto, decided to go shopping with my aunt and enjoy the sunshine. We were starving and wanted a place that would actually serve us and a place we could sit down at. Babbo's looked to be the only place like that....though serve us was not what they did. First of all, we were seated next to the bathrooms in a completely empty indoor section of the restaurant-first sign of a bad experience. Second, our waiter hounded us for our orders, before asking us if we would like to hear any of their specials or offering us bread. When we finally did place orders, our waiter disappeared into thin air. As we sat, we watched all the other patrons receive bread and water and oil, while we sat there with nothing. I had to politely ask another waiter for it, explaining I had no idea where our waiter was. We ordered a bottle of champagne, though the waiter basically uncorked, poured a little in my aunt's glass and decided to walk away. When our entree's came out, we saw that they were not so much on the light side that we expected-my sole, while good, tasted like a crusty piece of toast slathered in butter. My aunt's seared tuna was covered with such a thick sauce, that we wondered whether or not it was actually seared tuna. Odd. Overall, I was not pleased and neither was my aunt. We loved the mall, but will definitely not be sitting down for lunch at Babbo's again.
After a few strenuous hours of shopping, my parents and I dropped into Babbo's for lunch after seeing the delicious food people were eating at the tables outside. My first impression was that it was a little on the pricey side for a mall restaurant. I think sandwiches, pizzas, and salads were $15+, while entrees were over $20. A lot of people were eating focaccia sandwiches, but I had a craving for pizza and ordered the Babbo special. It was pretty good with big chunks of feta and huge olives. My only complaint is that the thin crust pizza wasn't very crispy. My mom's bolognese pasta was quite good as well, but I really loved the focaccia that came with it. Grrr, I knew I should have gotten a sandwich! It was crispy on the outside and slightly greasy and olive oily. Mmm yum. I'd give Babbo's more like 3.5 stars and I would come back, but I'd be more interested to check out the other options at the Stanford mall. I took a peek into La Baguette and their sandwiches and pastries looked quite intriguing...
First of all, I don't knw who thinks this is a mediterranean place. That's not anywhere in the name, and the owner is from Austria. Its very much a European-Italian style bistro. I came across it on accident one day. Have you ever walked into a place thinking it was something else? Well usualy when making this mistake I just leave. However, this time the waiters were so nice and friendly that I decided to stay. Big mistake on my part since the cheapest priced item was a bowl of soup for $13! For soup!!!?? But I had already commited to sitting down so I just decided to go with it. The soup was hungarian gouash, which Im a big fan of, so I thought 'why not?'. Wow! It was delicious!!! Literally bettert han goulash that I had while in Hungary! Firt of all the bwl was hugeand filed with chunks of potato and choice cuts of steak. t was very filling and yummy The soup itself was thinner than I'm used to but incredibly flavorful! I tried to eat it all but it over powered me. The food was definitely 4 stars, but he notch down on this review is for the ridiculous prices. The soup was great, but $13 is silly.
Lovely authentic place! The staff was very charming, and we had a few good laughs with them. The food was simple, well sized and really enjoyable. The service is ok, not super fast but we didn't really care. It was the WE and we had plenty of time. The focaccia bread, with olive oil & vinegar is so good! I then had the spicy sausage oven-made pizza with a cold beer, with a green salad and that was magical. Just a perfect break after a long sunny morning of hard-core shopping!
One of the best pizza's I've had, and not for an outragious price. I remember having some other food here too, and was very pleased. A wood fired oven provides a unique taste that you just can't beat, and the ingredients are all fresh and delightful. The location is a little cramped, but there's seating outdoors so you can view all the activity going on in the mall. If you don't like people watching, this place is deeply set into the building, so you can hide out in the back as well.
Best pizza, salads, pasta, soup, ambiance ever!  The owner came to our table and introduced himself.  You could see he took great pride in what he was doing, and that truly makes a magnificent restaurant. Go for the goat cheese salad.  It made me think I was back in St. Tropez.
I don't know whether or not to give this place 2 or 3 stars, so forgive me if the rating switches up again Me and my boyfriend were actually looking for another restaurant to have lunch but I decided on my plan B to go and try this place. Mediterranean food is one of my favorite types of food so I figured this place would have at least a decent looking menu. Anyways, most of the outdoor seating was full and we didn't really mind where we sat so we sat inside where we were one of only 3 couples. Once we got our menus I was getting pretty anxious to order and when I opened my menu I was kind of disappointed - everything on their lunch menu was overpriced! I mean the appetizers, salads, entrees, pastas...everything was  over $12; there were only 2 or 3 dishes that were $9.50, one of those being a cup of soup. A CUP of SOUP?!?! Anyways, I order the spinach pasta filled with veal and chicken ($17)  and when I finally got it,  there was only 11 pieces of spinach pasta.............sigh. (really wish I ordered the shrimp salad I was looking at...) Thank GOD it tasted really good so that sorta made up for it. Sauce was a little too salty though. Oh and they gave us the bread restaurants normally give before you order AFTER they brought us our food.  The bread was really really good though, but still kind of odd that they give it to you later...maybe our server just forgot? What really killed it for me was how overpriced the food was...I paid 24 dollars for one dish and a freaking cup of juice ($3.50, btw). I'm really glad everything tasted awesome but even someone like me that spends more money on food than anything wouldn't go back because even the food isn't enough for the price you pay. Maybe if I can magically pull money out of my ass or obtain a large bag full of money to spend I'll come back, but until that happens I'll stay clear.
Service - A bit slow. Took forever to get our order in, get our food, refill water, and get our check. Pizza - It's ok. Price - Expensive.
My tortellini with veal and chicken covered in cream sauce was DELICIOUS.  The wait staff and line cook were very friendly.  The place was pretty empty, but there were a few tables seated, and they all seemed happy with their food and server.  I felt like some pasta, so this place hit the spot.
I ordered Tuscan soup, and instead of that they brought me minestrone (which I hate).  The minestrone was pretty sad and came with two tiny slices of foccacia bread.  The polenta dish was good, but came alone except for a huge glop of butter on top.  The grilled chicken ceasar salad was the most disappointing, as the chicken was dry and stone cold.  The ceasar dressing had a nice texture, but lacked flavour. The ceasar salad had romaine leaves, sliced chicken and literally TWO crutons! The waiter brought out a dirty bowl and was irritated that I asked for another.   For drinks, the hot chocolate was pretty good but the ice water smelled fishy.  Prices were in a high range (the salad cost $15). The waiter's terrible attitude made me wonder how he got the job.  I will never set foot here again.
I only hit Stanford mall once in a blue moon, but all my forays here have met with good service,  so not sure which buffoons are working on the days other Yelpers come here. My dad loves this place for the lamb dishes, and we had a lovely wine/pizza/pasta/fish dinner with friends here. Seafood pizza was a big hit, as was our fish and pasta dishes.  A little pricey for the relatively small fish and salad, but nothing absurd given that it is Palo Alo.  Did not try the dessert or coffee since they don't strike me as a place that specializes in that sort of thing.
The food is consistently very good here.  Why not 5 stars...occasionally, the waitstaff gets your order wrong. I have been coming to this place since my daughter was in middle school and still a carnivore.  She's since become vegan.  She still loves this place, as do I. Wonderful soft polenta appetizer.  Awesome comfort food.  We also had the butter lettuce salad, nothing outstanding.  Just very fresh butter lettuce with a simple oil and vinegar dressing.  We both finished all of the salad.   Very refreshing. I've tried almost all of their main dishes, the latest being the filet of sole.  Great dish, outstanding sauce, crisp asparagus side, and a simple potato.  The potato sopped up the sauce beautifully. I've not tried the pizza because I figure if you want pizza, don't go to a fancy restaurant for that.  The pizza will be an afterthought. My daughter had the mushroom stew.  It's her favorite amongst the vegetarian choices.  That vegetarian food choices are offered in such a place are worth a couple of stars in itself.
I think this is one of the best options for dinner at the stanford mall.  I've been here three times now and it's been a solid experience every time.  The lamb ragou is great!  I had the mushroom ragou this last time and it was just ok.  It's a super light dish, not the red sauce that the lamb has, but the mushrooms are very tasty.  The service was very good - very warm and friendly wait staff, makes it feel very cozy and happy.  They're not extremely attentive since we never got cheese for our pastas, but that's ok, I got over it because their bread was so yummy. It's on the side close to sprinkles and sigonia's (the food market in the mall).  They have outdoor seating that looks cozy, but since I usually come out for dinner and I don't dress appropriately, I've never eaten outside. More than solid post shopping dinner, yum.  I'll be back again and again.
This place looks cool from the outside - a nice change from the chains floating around. Our waiter was horrible though, bringing cold food, never checking up or bringing a refill.  I had a pizza that was decent, but was probably comparable to a Calif. Pizza Kitchen creation.  Said pizza (Babbo's Pizza) was overpriced by about $6.
We had a small dog with us so we were limited to places that had outdoor dining while at Stanford Shopping Center.  Babbo's caught our eye and we took a seat.  We had no particular expectations but all three of us were extremely pleased with our meals, mine was the Gorgonzola and pine nut pizza which was amazing.  Babbo himself even stopped by our table to chat indicating that his restaurant had been in business there for over 20 years. We'll definitely be back. I highly recommend the restaurant and only reflecting four stars in my rating because I have not patronized the place frequently and to avoid overall irrational exuberance. By the way, the name plate by the door says "Babbo's Pizzeria"
Now I hate here many years ago and didnt really remember the meal. Guess it wasn't that striking. However having been back recently I will have to say I enjoyed the food. Good goulash and the fish/potato casserole was also solid. Sitting outside was kinda windy that day but great for the eclectic people watching. I think the downside is the prime Palo Alto rent you're paying for in the meal as a place like this anywhere else is probably 20-25% cheaper. 3.5 stars
Babbo's has a mix of the everyday run-of-the-mill American restaurant and really nice Spanish, Italian and Greek dishes. I do not believe that they have a separate lunch menu or lunch portions. The pizzas are all made in the brick oven and are quite tasty.  They used to have a make-your-own calzone, which was quite fantastic, but during my latest visit, I failed to see it on the menu (it may be only a dinner item?).  The paella comes in a very generous portion and is my stepfather's go-to dish. The wait staff is very attentive and everyone will thank you and wish you well as you leave.  Your meal will be expensive, so you might as well make the most of it and order something that you won't get anywhere else.
I'm still rating this a 4 star restaurant due to the great food, but I'm updating the review based on some additional info. Went here recently and noticed some cost cutting. I guess this isn't really a bad thing if it keeps the restaurant going in tough times. During the most recent trip, I ordered a glass of their house wine. It was terrible, so I asked them what it was. They said it was Mondavi, but my father judged it (and I agreed) below $2 chuck. The worst part was that they charged almost $10 for it. Not gonna do that again! I'll stick to the wines I know. So to sum up: good food, bad coffee, bad house wine.
Have been here a couple of times for dinner. Both times I had their lamb dish. The first was the... Read more 
I went to the Stanford Shopping Mall with my class, but we have could anywhere we desired. So my friend and I went here. We ordered San Francisco Crab Cakes. Everything is good except the waiting period for our food.
This is a great little restaurant in Stanford Shopping Center. The food is so fresh and is made behind a bar so  you can see the chefs working right in front of you.  The owner, Babbo, is usually walking around and twice has come to my table to chat, ask how the food is and talk about his skiing days in Europe.  The decor is fun and quaint and the lighting is very dim.  It is a little expensive but the service is intimate and the food is always delicious.
I am ONLY giving 5 stars for the following: Caesar salad w/ grilled prawns Tortellini w/ cream sauce Don't get the lemonade, they forgot to add sugar and water. It's like pure acid. The service sucks. But I have yet to find a place w/ better Caesar salad and tortellini! Delicious!
Two stars is generous for the simple fact the staff is HORRIBLE.  One patron said he was ready to order the server just yelled - I'll be back.  Horrible - "sir, it will be just a moment is more appropriate."  Food just eh.  But the service ruined it.
Kinda wish I saw the reviews for this place before visiting, but we were walking by, the weather was gorgeous, and a few tables were free outside.  The waiter was kind and personable and seated us quickly. The chestpains began when we opened the menu - holy cow was it pricey.  $15 for pizza the size of a small dinner plate?!  I guess it's "gourmet" but wow. Lucky for them, I was starving and really enjoying the view outside, so we stayed.  We went for a light dinner (light on the budget and light on the tummy) and split a pizza and (appetizer) salad. We got the Quattro...something pizza.  It had 2 slickes with capers and proscutto,  2 slices with anchovies and olives (YUM), 2 slices with ginormous atichoke hearts, and 2 slices with mushroom.  Nice way to lay out the ingredients so we literally split each flavor. The salad... I can't remember the name but it had gorgonzola cheese and walnuts.  Very good, except they went a little overboard with the cheese. We didn't try any desserts and instead soaked up some sun and did some people watching.  Most of the stars, sadly, are for the ambiance and waiters (based on the other reviews, I guess we got lucky).  The food was ok, but was way overpriced.  We'll try Max's instead next time.
A bit overpriced, but definitely tasty! We were starving as we got to the Stanford Mall. I was in the mood for something new so we decided to try out Babbo's. It was a nice sunny day so the outdoor seating was perfect. I wasn't aware that this was a Mediterranean Bistro, though.. I could've sworn that the store directory listings in the mall called this place Babbo's Pizzaria" or something?? We ordered the Pear-Gorgonzola Salad and, since we were thinking this was a pizza joint, the Sotto Mare Pizza. We were not disappointed with either one. The salad had thinly sliced, sweet pears and very creamy gorgonzola. The combination of those two with arugula and candied walnuts was delicious. The Sotto Mare Pizza was great! They serve the clams and mussels on the pizza with the shells on. The fish that came on the pizza was very juicy/flaky. The red sauce was the perfect flavor for the seafood, and the crust was nice and crunchy. I'll definitely order this one again the next time I come here. We had creme brulee also for dessert -- good, but personally, I can't really tell too big of a difference between good and bad creme brulee. I enjoyed my meal a lot... my only gripe is that the price is a bit high, especially for lunch.
Mediterranean Bistro? I think not. Babbo is a very Italian restaurant. The only reason I walked into this restaurant was because everywhere else was packed. The mall was insanely busy right before Christmas. The pizzas didn't look too intriguing and pasta are really not my thing. I decided to go with their house specialties. Seafood with Puff Pastry - (4 out of 5 stars) - I was told this is their best dish in the house afterward. I am happy to say it did not disappoint. Shrimps and scallops were arranged nicely on a puff pastry shell to resemble the shape of a crab (photo attached). The richness of creamy sauce was what made this dish great. Next time I will remember to find out more about the sauce. Minus one star because the puff pastry shell was not house made. Grilled Ahi Tuna (Forgot the actual name on the menu) - (3 out of 5 stars) - The ahi tuna was grilled perfectly to medium and the quality of the fish was nice. Unfortunately the sauce was too salty and didn't really go too well with the tuna. The scalloped potatoes on the side were quite tasty. It was a very busy day in the mall so the service was understandably slow. We sat down for good 10 minutes before our server showed up. If that happen on a normal day my review would probably be more negative.
This place had excellent food, but the service was okay. First of all, we were sat down by our waiter, who took our order and walked away. In the meantime, he served two other tables their bread and olive oil and vinegar. We waited for ours, but it never came. Finally, once our salad arrived, we asked for the bread and olive oil and vinegar, which eventually came, but of course no olive oil and vinegar. Instead, another waiter had to see we did not get any, so offered us some. Other waiters had to assist us throughout the evening. Kind of irritating, but maybe that's just how the restaurant works. The salad and pizza were great! We got the baked goat cheese salad, which was delicious! It was displayed fantastically, and even came with mini toasted bread with olive tapenade on it! If you do order this particular salad, make sure you like goat cheese, because there's a lot of it! We also got Pizza Babbo. After loads of goat cheese, the feta on the pizza became a bit much, but overall the pizza was delicious! Also, the ingredients are extremely fresh, and I love how their kitchen is in the front and not behind doors. At one point of time, the chef was cooking 6 dishes at once! Great place with okay service. Quaint ambiance, especially if you sit outside!
We  came here for lunch and while the atmosphere of the mall was really nice, the restaurant itself is way too small, they need to re-position where all the seats were. The location where I was sitting was the waiter throughout my meal kept on asking if I could skoot up a bit, which was quite annoying. The way the tables were positioned, the wait-staff couldn't get to the corner of the room to serve the other customers. The food was too expensive. $17 for spaghetti? $17 for a lamb sandwich? Regarding the taste of the food, I had their Focaccia Babbo and thought the bread was very good, they salted it up which gave it a kick. They gave me honey mustard on the side when the sandwich already had sauce, what was that for? Very confusing Anyways, disregarding the experience, the food was really not that impressive.
I am reading the reviews and realize I should have checked Yelp before coming. The food is not good, completely overpriced, but the owner is a wacko and the worst restaurant experience of my life. He is so lucky he is in prime real estate in Palo Alto. I am not going to relive the ridiculous situation this man put us (especially the child with us) in to tell you what happened  All is say is DO NOT COME HERE!  There are plenty of decent places besides this hole.
First off, I don't have much feeling about this place, and I'm writing this mostly to tell the mighty Yelp god I'm alive and well. I went to Babbo's with two friends, one who's in town from Germany for a 3-week SLAC internship, the other arrived from Germany just months ago performing her particle bombardment duties. It wasn't a flawed dining experience, but neither was it spectacular. Sitting in a busy corner with a merlot and watching the Stanford Mall shopping crowd swarming by set a semi-bourgeois tone; a delicious smoked salmon salad completes the deal. Mind you, this is the Stanford Mall, the crown jewel of strip malls, so no free bread and hummus should be expected, nor was it offered. The friendly waiter deserves high marks for making my German-mannered company feel at home. It's understandably pricey, but you do get a little bit of decadent pleasure back.
Great atmosphere, staff are helpful yet chilled out, and food is decent too. It's a rather small place, so you'll be fairly close to your neighbors, but I don't mind that. I thought the lamb chop was juicy and good. Smoked salmon dish comes with a pizza bread, and I liked the combination very much.
Ate lunch outside on a great summer day.  Table was very uneven (on a bit of a drain slope in the brickwork) to the point of being distracting.  Tables are way too close together for anything other than casual conversation. Menu selection was sufficient, but a bit limited.  I ended up with a gorgonzola & pear salad that was good.  The gorgonzola was mild and very creamy -- great play off the pears.  The Baked Goat Cheese Salad was good, but huge -- no way to eat all of it nor to really manage the size of the goat cheese chunk. Limited menu, adequate service, a bit pricey for what you get.  Not bad for stopping to eat while shopping, but definitely not a destination restaurant.
I actually thought the food here was really good.  I came here last night with some coworkers and we all were really happy with what we got.  Not to mention the menu has a good selection of Italian and Mediterranean fare.  The problem here is the prices -- it is really expensive.  And not to say the food isn't worth it because it might be.  But you walk in and you kind of feel like it s a pizza joint -- no tablecloth, paper napkins, etc. -- the bathroom is a sight for sore eyes.  I loathed having to use it.  And yet they charge a lot for their plates - I think the pasta dish I got was $19.  Salads and apps started at $7 or $8.  If I am paying this much for a meal I would prefer to feel like the bathroom I am using is clean.  Not the case here. The wine selection is good and surprisingly not over-priced.
The place is very nice, the ambiance is cozy, feels like you are in a small restaurant in Florence. The staff is friendly, not very attentive. The Chianti was so-so, and the bread was oily at the bottom, not too impressive. But the special menu of the day is usually great. The crab cakes in the paprika sauce is fabulous. The pizza is very delicately done, if it can be done. The tables are closely situated, we had a great time listening to the conversations on the tables around us. One to remember was: Two girls behind us : "My mother used to workout in the nude at home, so she had lot of husbands. Now I do it some times, I am getting guys interested in me too" I almost chocked on my crab cake.
This place had decent Italian food, but poor service. The waiter kept forgetting to get us our drinks, bring napkins, and bring our bread. AND it was during a random off-peak hour (we were there at 3, I think). Maybe it was just that one waiter. Oh well. Our past and pizza were OK, nothing special.
I came here with a friend who said their bread was amazing. I love bread so I had to try it! We went at lunch time on a Thursday and there was a decent amount of people seated. We ordered drinks, waited for the waiter to bring the bread, waited, then finally asked for some bread. I wonder if some restaurants to this on purpose? We finally got the bread and it was delicious! But I still would have likes some olive oil with it. On to my lunch. I ordered the focaccia sandwich with salmon. The bread had whole olives in it which were too salty so I took them out. the aioli was very good and made the sandwich even better. It also came with sliced tomatos, watercress, and a carrot cucumber chopped mix. I only ate half because it was a pretty big meal, perfect for sharing. The price of the sandwich: $16.95 Worth it? I guess, but I'm not rushing to get back here.
The food was incontrovertibly charming. But I must sadly take off one star for the overpriced-ness. My friend and I had an urgent business at the Stanford Mall 8 in the evening (unexpected too). After it was finished, we decided to drop in Babbo's because it was near the parking lot, and we were total strangers here. The food inside smelled scrumptious, alluring my ravenous stomach with tantalizations. So we went in. We were promptly seated (outside - perfect, cool evening). But after that, the service was a bit too slow (even when it was an off-peak time with only a few other customers). Water came late (and it tasted strongly of chlorine too). So did the bread (cold, soggy, and oily - not what you'd expect from a restaurant with so many expensive items). Furthermore, the place barely had pasta - just pizza, sandwiches, and stuff like risottos and steaks. Food ordered - Seafood Risotto: My companion ordered this, and she was delighted by its full, bursting flavor. It had a hearty batch of clams, shrimps, and whatnot. However, the $21.50 price tag: is it worth it? Hmm... Pepporinta (sp?) Pizza - Baked in the traditional fireplace oven. Delicious, rich flavor with lots of chewy mozzarella cheese. Definitely worth the $13.50 price tag. Excellent! If you don't mind the price... GO FOR IT! Some tasty food here...
Ordered the seafood pizza and gorgonzola pear salad.  I would definitely come back for the salad because I love pear salads and this one was really good.  The pizza description said it had spicy prawns and I was a little put off by that because I can't stand anything spicy, but when we got our pizza it was not spicy at all, which is good for me but for someone that expected some heat it might be a disappointment.  The first thing I noticed when the pizza came out was a wave of fishy seafood stench (just like walking into a seafood market).  The pizza itself was okay. Pros: gorgonzola pear salad was really good and sitting outside on a sunny day with shade was relaxing. Cons: really fishy smelling pizza.
Ate at this place today. THE Service was horrible! You have to constantly ask a waiter (not yours) for water. It got to the point where I got up and went behind the bar to get the pitcher of water myself. The place was not busy at all at the time. This place got ONE STAR only because the food was prepared very quickly, maybe due to this place not very busy for lunch. We only came here because there was a long wait at Max's Opera Cafe nearby and wanted choices other than salads and sandwiches for lunch. We should have gone next door to the mini market and bought a hot lunch while sitting outside watching shoppers pick their fruit! For a sausage pizza and spaghetti and meatballs, the bill total was around $38.00! Keep walking by this place and don't stop!
This indeed is a find! we came here last weekend for lunch and didnt know what to expect. the decor is like we came straight into a real Italian place in Europe and the food that came after didnt leave us unhappy. In fact it was amazing! This is a non fuzz simple Italian restaurant with delicous pasta and pizza. Thanks to the team, we loved it!
The food and service was good, but I just can't give this restaurant anything higher than two stars because it's way overpriced. I can think of at least half a dozen other restaurants in the area that offer the same items on the menu without burning a hole in your wallet. $18 for a caesar salad with pears on it?! C'mon man!!
My friend and I just went there recently for a "girl's lunch."  The setting is perfect since it's right in Stanford Mall and it provides an slightly fancier alternative to the other places. The service was pretty decent though nothing special.  We ordered smoked salmon appetizer that came with a pizza bread, but then our waiter accidentally spilled everything on the empty table next to us.  Luckily, the salmon was ok, but the pizza bread and dill sauce was all over the empty table.  He replaced the sauce, but then picked up the pizza bread and said, "it should be alright" and served it right to us.  Yikes!  Granted, it was an empty and presumably clean table, but still. As for food, we did enjoy the smoked salmon appetizer, and the pear  and walnut salad.   Contrary to other diners, our pear was quite ripe and the walnuts delicious.  We topped it off with some paella valenciaga, which was pretty yummy too.  When we asked for the dessert menu, our waiter said to us, "you two are big eaters.  I like it!"   Hey, did you have to be so honest? Anyway, all in all, I thought the price was slightly expensive for the type of food served.  But given the location and convenience to a fancy shmancy mall, I'm not surprised.   Given a choice, I probably will go to the Neiman Marcus cafe (3rd floor of Neiman Marcus) rather than go back to Babbo's.
Well, there's some things here that are OK but the core of the dinner---the Pizza---was only mediocre. Highlights: Friendly waiters, outside dining in the the Palo Alto evening air, cucumber salad had a nice acidic zing to it, lemonade is tasty because apparently it's fresh and unsweetened. Low moments: The pizza was greasy, even though the crust was OK---mostly because the cheese seemed either too much or lower quality than the flour in the crust.  Pepperoni sausage had no distinctive flavor.  The great lemonade isn't supplied with a dissolved sugar solution (under barkeep, see: simple syrup); the bill was high ($40 for two with one pie, one salad, two lemonades, no liquor). Also, quite strangely; on the Iphone mobile Yelp App, this place doesn't appear; maybe, with only three stars, Yelp Mobile was trying to protect me and I didn't know it. Oh well.
Babbo's is a warm, neighborhood-style Italian bistro that has somehow found it's way to Stanford Shopping Center. The wait staff treats you like family, as does the owner, who often pops in to charm guests. The entrees are very good, but the gelato with berries and zabaglione is a real winner (especially on a warm evening). This isn't a trendy place at all, and the menu has barely changed over the last decade, which is actually really nice to find. (Old world charm and simplicity trumps flashy ingredients here.) Prices are exactly what you'd expect at a good, established restaurant in Silicon Valley, and service is fantastic. This is the perfect place to stop by after hard day of shopping!
This is one of my favorite restaurant.  I went over there again for lunch on Tuesday.  Tutto marie pasta was very good so the truffle cake (I guess I was very hungry and finished everything!!).  Not sure why the coffee served "warm" instead of "hot".  So I am giving 4 stars instead of 5.. I will for sure go back again as this is one of best if you want to have a lunch break while shopping in Stanford Shopping Center.  Outdoor seating is relaxing, but please be noted that they won't allow you to place your furry kids directly on top of the chair...  so bring a pet stroller if you have one.  ; )
The food was good, but not outstanding, priced for its location. But it was nice to sit outside in the good weather. We had the gorgonzola pear salad, pizza margherita, and pizza babbo's. Again, good food, but nothing over the top. Decent service.
Yummy yum!! It was great.I have been there ten times at least.Be careful not to get full off the bread before your meal,it's so easy to do. It has a nice cozy atmosphere too.The food and service is equally great.You must go at least once to try the lamb tangine,if you don't eat red meat ,try the fish with the pesto sauce...MMM!!!
Sea bass (a touch under $30) with potatoes gratin for lunch tasted excellent less some odd skin bits in the potato that might have been skin from a head of garlic.  Typical over-salted of any high end restaurant I've eaten in lately but it wasn't overly salty throughout so it was manageable. Son's steak was rare, but I worked up sweat anyway cutting it for him. Improved knives or steak would be welcome.  Typically, he cuts his own food and has for many years. Even telling my son he was incurring wrath of our ancestors as part-chinese who could not wield a knife properly was  not enough incentive to motivate him to be able to cut it. He didn't complain of taste, which probably means it was excellent as he is very picky. He ate all of it and all the potatoes. Waiter was okay. With espresso and vanilla ice cream with chocolate syrup, along with drinks, tip, lunch for 2 was a bit under $100. For a hot noon-time @ Stanford Mall, which, at least of which I'm aware, lacks good food sufficient to surfeit a boy having a growth spurt, with afore-mentioned pre-teen stating he was starving, it was an oasis. Even if an imperfect and expensive oasis, it calmed the storms. Tables are close together but aisles are very spacious so it's not that bad. It was a nice $100 break mid-day on a Monday. Lights are kind of hokey, new wave. Paintings are ?'20s European modern but more light hearted. A lot of flowers in vases.  Waiter nice, but not classically trained. They forgot bread entirely. Worked for us as there wasn't all that much table space for two. They didn't hurry the service nor the bill and service was not ,as is it typically in most restaurants with $30 minute plate of fish, intrusive and unsettling. Bathroom door was locked initially. Help who was not serving us told my son to go find his own waiter when he asked for assistance. No view to speak of whatsoever. Nice big pole in front of my face and no mirrors so I couldn't see towards front of restaurant. Given other options and low blood sugar boy, give it a 3. Only one customer's cell phone went off during lunch and there were no "let me look important" types in the restaurant imposing upon others with their cell phone usage, etc.  Mostly retired folks. It'd be nice if they'd provide cheese/fruit service or make it a bit more Italian traditional but again, compared to anything else of which I'm personally aware at Stanford Mall, it hit the spot fine.
During our mad dash to Sprinkles before closing, my best friend and I ran into Babbos.  We walked through this little alley with outdoor seating and thought that it would be a nice place to have dinner.  So why not right?! What do we have to loose? The outdoor seating was nice but the only thing I didn't like about it was that the tables were SOOOO close together.  We were basically a hands length from our neighbor.  That was just a little too close for comfort since everyone can hear our conversation. Since we've never been here, we wanted to sample the menu and opt'd to share 3 dishes.  Of course we had to get a glass of wine to go with our dinner....after all, it was a girls night out! :) Napa Acacia Caneros Chardonnay paired great with our appetizer. Mediterranean mussels- This was yummy to have as an appetizer.  The mussels were just a lil on the "dinky" side but the sauce was great for bread! Gorgonzola Pear Salad- You have to be a Gorgonzola lover or a big cheese fan to enjoy this salad.  The creamy cheese (plentiful amount) + sweat pear slices + candied walnuts + house vinaigrette dressing = yummmmy!   I would go back to have this salad if I'm feeling very cheesy! Peperonata Flat Bread Pizza- MEATY MEATY MEATY and yummy.  The pizza was perfect for 2.  The pepperoni was different than your usual pepperoni...it was meaty!  The caramelized onions gave the pizza a little sweetness, which I enjoyed very much. The meal came out to $75(tip included), which wasn't bad since we got a half bottle of wine.
Went there with very low expectation because the Max's was busy at the time and I was very hungry.  However, what I found there was one of the best crab cakes ever!  Three times better than the one at the Morton's in SJ.  And this was the extra order after we finished our main courses.  Wow!  It came with the sauce resembling lobster bisque.   Really surprised because it wasn't this good last time we tried about a year ago...  What has happened? The rustic pizza was pretty good with fresh mozzarella topping (made of buffalo milk?)  French style red snapper had very french, although a little salty, cream sauce which reminded me of the delicious dish I had enjoyed in Paris long time ago.  The seared ahi tuna my wife had also came with special sauce that went along nicely with the main ingredient.  Service was a bit lacking, like I had to ask for beverage refill twice, but overall OK. The $9 dessert (ice cream puff?) wasn't quite as good as expected.  The double espresso was plenty, but too acid.  Double cappuccino was so so. Price was medium high but fresh ingredients quite made up for.  I am thankful to the lady who was eating outside who willingly recommended this place to us.  I'm happy that food quality in Palo Alto restaurants are going up these days.  I'll definitely visit Babbo's again.
I came here with my mom, we had a pleasant experience eating lunch there. Service was friendly and prompt, we sat outside to enjoy the sun. We had their pear salad and spicy chicken focaccia. The pear salad was amazing! Very refreshing and everything (cheese, pear, greens, walnuts, dressing) went very well together, one of the best salad's I've had in a long time! The spicy chicken focaccia was interesting, but not very wow-some. But good comfort food, and the honey mustard sauce on the side was very pleasant! A comfortable casual place to have a nice lunch for a reasonable price. 4 stars!
I've been coming here for over 20 years, and have had pretty much everything on the menu. Mr. Fono, the proprietor, is a charming man who is often at the restaurant on busy weekend days. The service is great, and many of the servers have been at the restaurant since they opened. The food is definitely Italian with some Mediterranean influences. The pizzas are from a wood burning oven, my favorites being the Pizza Babbo and the margherita. The shrimp salad is healthy, filling and tasty, as is their caesar. The seafood in puff pastry is excellent, and they have some great soups as well. The sandwiches are the best deal on the menu, and are very large. Overall a well rounded menu that has something for everyone. The desserts tend to be underwelming and over priced. Speaking of cost, this place is a little bit expensive for lunch, but well priced for dinner. But, the food is high quality, the setting is charming, and it is in Stanford Shopping Center, so you're mostly paying for the real estate. Eating outside here can be a really wonderful way to spend an afternoon. I prefer it to every other sit down place at the mall, without a doubt, and it is on par cost wise with most restaurants as well.
We were strolling around the mall and came here for lunch. I had the grilled salmon and my friend had the seafood risotto. My dish was very flavorful. The fish was served with grilled tomatoes, zucchini, lentils and potatoes au gratin. My friend ate all of the risotto, so I suppose that was good, too. The service was very good as well. The white-haired owner (whose picture as a young man is on the menu -- too cute!) tried to get me to order the salmon poached because the flavor was better. The waiter also brought my friend an empty bowl for her seafood shells. The bill came to $50 plus tip, which I thought was steep for lunch in a mall. (Course, it was Palo Alto.)
The lemon chicken is the best I have ever had by a mile.  Great food.  I have had good experience with the service, but I try to avoid busy times. I just had a house salad and Hungarian Gullash (sorry for the spelling) that were fantastic.
Babbo's while small, and in a mall, has service refined, and prices just fine. Between you and me, the cucumber salad's sublime.
the coffee is not even luke warm, it's served room temperature. the iced tea is $3, watered down, and comes in a small glass with no refill. the gorgonzola and pear salad with balsamic vinagrette is overdressed, the walnuts stale, and the pears are unripe and tasteless (might as well have been jicama). $15. the best part of their quattro pizza was the crust. it was light and crisp but their toppings definitely need work. a quarter mushrooms, a quarter anchovies, a quarter proscuitto, and a quarter artichoke. the artichoke and mushrooms were ok. we only got ONE slice of proscuitto but about a whole jar of capers. and the worst quarter was the anchovies. whole filets that weren't previously rinsed. it was worse than eating a spoonful of salt. $16. service was slow and kind of rude. there was an elderly couple sitting next to us and they had paid their bill with their credit card. the waiter returned the check for signature but had neglected to give the credit card back. good thing the elderly man still had his wits and asked for his credit card. the waiter fished in his apron pocket and returned it. no apologies but just a nervous laugh...i found that HIGHLY suspicious. $40 wasted. mall food would have been better.
Three and a half stars, but I rounded up.  I'd give Babbo's five stars if their mushroom ragout was consistent: it's my very favorite dish here and it really depends on who's cooking it, as sometimes it's perfection (it's Mushroom Heaven, actually, when it's done right), but other times it's overcooked and overly salty.  I found the waitstaff to be friendly but the service itself can be iffy (sometimes you have to wait awhile for drinks or the check), and the tables are really close together so you're unintentionally eavesdropping on other diner's conversations, and they're doing the same with you.
The seafood puff pastry is delicious! The sauce is rich and full of flavor and the shrimp, scallops, and mushroom go perfectly with the pastry shell! Don't waste any of the sauce by dipping the focaccia bread they give you into it!
Came to the Stanford mall in the afternoon, starving for lunch before plunging into hardcore shopping. I passed by this cute looking restaurant, remembering that I had came across it last time I was at the mall and wanted to try out the place. Looking at the menu, the prices were a bit pricey, but not too expensive. I ordered a pizza with caramelized onions, italian sausage, and mushrooms (I forgot the exact name of the dish), and my friend ordered a shrimp angel hair pasta that had Sherry white wine cream sauce on it. The pizza was a decent portion for one person, as well as the pasta. However, my pizza was pretty burnt on the bottom, for the whole entire pizza. Pretty over cooked. I was also expecting a thinner authentic italian type of pizza (aka brooklyn style), but the pizza was a lot more thicker. I tried my friend's pasta, and I preferred that over my dish, even though I felt it was a bit salty. The food wasn't horrible, it was enjoyable...but honestly nothing to talk about. Another major downside was the silverwear we had. Both my friend's and my own silverwear all were dirty with old food on it. Gross. When I stopped our waiter to let him know they were both dirty and we needed new ones, our waiter didn't even let me finish speaking, and just grabbed one other set of utensils and placed them on our table, not even apologizing or anything. I felt that was a bit rude and not good customer service. Another thing that peeved me that my friend and I both noticed: our waiter seemed to be more polite and attentive towards another party he was serving a couple tables away from us. These people were elderly ladies dressed up in nice clothes....maybe he thought he'd get a better tip from them vs. my friend and I who were dressed more casually and were minorities? Or maybe that's just jumping to conclusions! But either way, our waiter sucked at customer service for my table. Would I come back here again? Not unless I was invited to or it was someone else's idea. The food was ok, but there are better places around the area I would pick over here.
It's satisfying, but as others have said, pretty expensive for what it is. My Foccacia Babbo was good, but just did not seem like it should have cost $17. But let's face it, Stanford Shopping Center is the perfect fit for a place like that, and it's not like anything else is exactly cheap. So I enjoyed the nice day and opportunity to sit outside, and rolled with it.
Came here while shopping at the Stanford mall.  I checked yelp and this place was rated at 3 stars.  And all the users were right.  This place is a very solid 3 stars.  The food isn't amazing.  The service is great.  I tired the fire roast muscles, the pizza and the spaghetti. The muscle had lots of flavor and were cooked perfectly.   Out of all of those dishes, the muscles and the spaghetti were the best.  The pizza was the disaappoint of the bunch.  A little bland.  The crust was so so and I felt like they could have used better quality cheese.
I got their babbo pizza and sandwich. I loved the lamb in the sandwich and the tomatoes on the pizza. Pricey though
My husband took me here on our first date and I was impressed with the food! They're paella is the best hands down!!!!! Their crab cakes are pretty good too & sometimes the owner is there too checking up on his customers. I like that he's a part of his restaurant and cares about his customers. They have good wine too
Nothing special here. Tried the Pizza--crust bland, sauces meeh. Poor service. Not worth coming to.
I guess you can not please everyone based on the not so great reviews.  I find Babbo's charming. Yes the place is pricey but come on- its STANFORD SHOPPING CENTER. Amazing salads and desserts.  This place is a treat!
I went here with a friend because Max's was closed. I regret not looking at the menu before sitting down. The prices are outrageous for what you get. I paid $14 for a pathetic foccacia sandwich. They burned the grilled vegetables and my friends chicken!! I could only eat half the sandwich. I told them it was burned and they didn't do anything! The seating is also very cramped and it's dark and somewhat dingy. I overheard a couple with a baby ask for a high chair and they said they didn't have them. Kinda strange for such a high price place. Needless to say I won't be going back there.
Came here for a late lunch with the hub, it was pretty good.  He ordered the salmon and I ordered the seafood pasta which was just as good.  The only thing I didn't care for was the tight seating in the back of the restaurant, any closer and I would have been able to hug the lady next to me.
At the last minute my mom and I decided to go out to dinner.  At first we were thinking of going to down town Palo Alto but after starting to drive over there we pretty much decided we were not in the mood for waiting for 45 minutes or more for a table so we headed over to the shopping center.  Thinking we were just going to go to Max's (as we both know what we like there) we saw Babbo's and asked ourselves if we had ever been there before.  We had not and felt like trying something new (plus there was no line to be seated) We were sat right away at a small table of which you can tell they were trying to put as many tables as possible in a tiny space but the lighting was pleasant and we did not seem to mind. Now for the food.  I ordered the Cesar salad which was really big and should be split between two for an appetizer and my mom had the vegetable soup which looked amazing!  It was like a hearty Minestrone soup with yummy olive bread on the side.  I ordered a glass of wine of which I asked what he recommended and my glass was crisp, sweet, and refreshing so if you are not always in the mood to figure out which wine you might want just ask the waiter what they recommend.  For the main course I had the salmon which was amazing.  The perfect size piece with a creamy potato slices buttery goodness on one side, roasted tomato and zucchini on the other and lentils.  It was exactly what I wanted.  The fish was in a buttery sauce that made it taste even better.  My mom had the chicken which looked amazing in a dark brown sauce but also tasted amazing.  It needed bread on the side to dip in the sauce.  Overall.... We were really happy and satisfied with our meals.  If you are on a diet... ummm.. don't be when you go here.  Be aware that the waiters are a little bit difficult in regards to grabbing their attention but the food was brought out with the perfect amount of time between courses.  This could be a really cute date place because the food is good the lighting is nice and the ambiance is upscale.  I will definitely go back!  ENJOY!
Waiter was good but food was the pits.  Unripe tomatoes for a $15 salad!  Risotto which was in no way risotto, more like rice in a sauce with seafood.  Tomato sauce on spaghetti which seemed utterly commercial.  $84 for one starter, two mains and a kids bowl of pasta with no drinks was outrageous.  We will never be hungry at Stanford Shopping Center again.  Totally empty but they wouldn't give us a banquette for the kids to boot.  Did I mention stale bread?
It was fine but too expensive for the quality.
After a quick mall trip we decided to eat here just because it looked a nice place.  Unfortunately there was no menu outside, but the sign indicated, pizza, pasta, sandwiches... When we received the menus I kept looking for the other items.  There was no pasta, 5 pizzas, 5 foccacia sandwiches, around 15 seafood dishes (I'm allergic to fish, so that ruled that out) and around 5 meat dishes, lamb chops being $30.  The appetizer salads were anything between $10 and $15.  This was meant to be a quick cheap bite at the mall. Hubby and me both ordered the foccacia burger which is just a sandwich with a few lettuce leaves as a a side, we ordered a side of potato gratin $7.50.  My daughter ordered a margarita pizza. When the food came, the potato gratin was 3 slices of potato deep and in a square around 10cm.  I've eaten in steak houses that gave you more potato for your $7.50.  My burger was cold, so I had to send it back, which was dealt with well by the waiter.  When I did get it back it wasn't very good, bland and unjuicy. With a tip the bill was $90, we would have got better food elsewhere for half the price. I'm confused by all the reviews that say they love the pasta, what pasta?
I feel sad giving it only 2 stars, but here's why I am: So originally there was another Italian restaurant at Stanford shopping center that my dad and I would always go to for lunch and order the same exact thing, but it closed down a number of years ago and rumor was that the same owner or something or another had opened up this restaurant, sooo we had to come and check it out. So my mom, aunt and baby cousin and I go and sure enough, they have the same dishes that we always ordered [ Cappellini con Gamberi and the Seafood Pastry Puff]. And oh the joy when I smelled my childhood and we got our dishes looking exactly the same. Then I took a huge bite of my pasta, and everything tasted - like childhood, but soggy. To my huge disappointment, the pasta was way overcooked and getting almost mushy in my bowl. After our meal I asked the waiter if I could next time have it cooked a bit more al dente or perhaps switch from angel hair to another pasta so that it wouldn't absorb so quickly. Sadly, he informed that they precooked their pasta, so there was nothing they could do. For the price, they really should not be precooking their pasta. I would be willing to wait an extra 7 minutes to get freshly cooked pasta, really. That  being said, the flavors were all still very tasty - typically very heavy though, as with any cream sauce. The Seafood Pastry Puff must be eaten quickly though, because the pastry will also get soggy quickly, but the seafood was cooked well (I hate overcooked protein and want to cry when my scallops are overcooked -- Gordon Ramsey outburst anyone?) So. 2 stars because they did not meet the standard for an Italian restaurant especially with that price range. I can't speak for the rest of the dishes, and of course the staff is super friendly and warm, so the place isn't lacking in service... it's just precooked pasta/overpriced and occasionally has a snobby customer(s) that make their distaste for having a fussy toddler around at the restaurant, during lunch, outside, much too blatant. Oh btw, the sitting outdoors is shaded, which is nice, but the tables are almost right next to each other, so all the more reason to make nice and get cozy with your neighbors. My recommendation? If you like angel hair, best to bring your own, otherwise order something else!
Little restaurant in the Stanford mall. This place is suppose to be semi-high class but doesn't really make it. The food is good but not for the price. I had a seafood puff pastry which had shrimp and scallops in a great, rich cream sauce but the pastry was soggy and it did not come with any sides. The bread they serve can be stale also, but if it's not, it's very good foccacia.
Really cute Mediterranean tucked into the Stanford shopping mall. Decent wine selection and GREAT thin pizzas (I did the salmon, yes folks, that's right, salmon pizza, with goat cheese, and it was deeeelicious).  The service is gracious and attentive (as they say). I wouldn't travel ultra-far to eat here but it is a great choice if you're in the 'hood.
I like its outside sitting and it does remind you of italian. food was okay and not so impressive but not bad at all.
Overpriced.  Minimal service.  You don't get much for your money at this place. It was a nice day and we wanted to sit outside for lunch.  We are new in town and have never dined at Babbos so we asked for outdoor seating.  Nothing special about their tables; just not a lot of outdoor dining to choose from in that particular area of the mall.  We wanted to try something else as we had already tried Max's Opera Cafe. It wasn't very busy, but it still took a while for them to seat us.  There were three of us but we were only handed two menus by a waiter, who then promptly left without talking to us.  Another waiter came up to take our drink orders and I asked for another menu, he said okay, and then left.  He comes back much later to take our order without ever getting us that third menu.  I gawked at the menu because everything was so expensive.  We ordered the cheapest items on the list, two hamburgers for $13.95 each plus $2.50 to add cheese, and a small ceasar salad for $8.50.  None of these plates included sides.  No fries, no slaws, no nothing.  The beef patties came on oily ciabatta bread, which was okay, and a few slices of tomatoes, and plain shredded carrot and sprouts.  The small glass of soda was almost $3 and the glass of iced tea was $3.50.  It didn't take long to finish the soda, and I thought it was weird that the waiter looked right at the empty glass and didn't ask if we wanted a refill.  I finally asked for another one, and as it turns out, they charged us for that second soda.  That's right, no free soda refills there. Oh, another thing, I asked for my hamburger to be well done.  It was raw pink even before I got to the middle of it.  I told the waiter and he gave me a look that told me he was annoyed and said that if I wanted to he can put it back on the grill.  Really?  You would risk contaminating everybody else's food just for moi?  I said no, thanks, and he quickly left with no apologies. The service, I thought, was just terribly lacking.  So much so that I actually entertained the thought of not leaving a tip.  Still, we ended spending about $60 on lunch for three people, and we were still hungry.  I ate again as soon as I got home. Overall, I find them to be pretty stingy on their food and their waiters could use some customer service training.  I would never eat there again.
Babbo's is more like 2.5 stars because it's overpriced and the food is just average.  But the friendly waiters bumps it up a notch.  Babbo's is never busy like Max's next door, so it's okay if you're meeting others at the mall and you need a quiet place to eat at your long-time leisure.  We were not rushed even though we were at Babbo's for 2 hours catching up among friends.  If you want better tasting food at better prices, go next door to Max's Cafe.  If you need a quiet, unrushed place to eat and you absolutely cannot drive to downtown Palo Alto and you must eat at the mall, then I suppose Babbo's is okay.
Came here during lunch time.  The server or whatever the position of the employee pretty much refused to let us sit inside, so of course we had no choice but to sit outside.  I arrived exactly at 12:00 pm no assistance after being seated, then at around 12:05 a customer was sat behind me then immediately to my right.  keep in mind my drink order wasn't taken and nobody else had come to talk to me since being seated.  5 more minutes pass and the customers sat around me had already got help and drinks but I hadn't.  I attempted to get their attention but my efforts were in vain as nobody responded.  So I sat and waited for another 21 minutes and 32 seconds since that is how long an episode of Bob's Burger's was and still no help!  I ended up leaving since I ran out of patience and ended up going to Max's Opera Cafe where I received service in a jam packed place.  I'll be sure to never go back to this sad excuse of a restaurant, and to think I was about to pay 20 bucks for a most likely horrible dish of pasta!
Overpriced  bistro in a nice mall.  Ok food and small portion.  I would go to Max which is located just a few steps away.
Are you kidding me?  Two pizzas and a coke for $40? And it's not like it's quality pizza either:  I think I've had crispier ones out of a microwave.
This is my favorite restaurant to go to when I go up to Stanford. I really like the vegetable plate. The flavors are great and everything is really fresh. The pizzas are great as well. I always look forward to my meal here. The other choices in the shopping center seem like chain restaurants so this is the only one that seems worth it.
Mussels and clams with pasta--uh, what happened to the mussels and clams? Babbo's serves mediocre food in a crammed atmosphere at stratospheric prices.  Personally, I'll stick with Max's next door.
Was a little disappointed today.  My husband and I go to this place for lunch a lot because we LOVE their sandwiches.  Sometimes we go there for dinners but it's pricey.  We decided to splurge tonight but didn't have the most positive experience.  We love the food but the service is a hit or a miss. I feel like if you're going to charge $20-30 for an entree the service should be pretty good. We ordered the sea bass and prawns linguine dishes. We also both had a glass of wine. First, our server didn't bring us any bread. He didn't refill our water glasses when they were empty. And it wasn't even busy.  At one point I spilled my glass of wine which was still pretty full.  Granted it was my fault and nobody else's but I feel like at a place like this they should have offered me a refill. Our server came and cleaned up the spillage but that was it. They charge 9.50 a glass so I was a little disappointed. We still tipped the guy 15% since we're not mean people but I really didn't feel like he deserved a tip. It's too bad because we like their food. Nowadays I feel like restaurants have excellent service due to slower business. I don't think I'll go there again. Including tip we paid $90 for our meal (just me and my husband) and we didn't feel good about how we spent our money which sucks.
If I was the owner of this bistro, I would be ashamed to even call this a pizza. It was probably the worst I ever had. The dough was half-baked and it was not even a good dough. But the worst and most disgusting part of this pizza was the toppings. They were cold. One of the toppings was artichokes. They were just taking out of a can and put on the top after the dough was made, so it actually tasted like a can. The rest of the toppings were just cold and awful. I also have to mention that this place is kind of expensive for what they serve. Service was very slow in spite of just a few people inside.  I would give this place zero stars.
This place is soooo expensive for what you get. Waiting period takes forever. Owner is pretty weird too. Owner sometimes watches you eat, which is pretty weird. Service is only good if you're a privileged white girl that has alot of money. I ordered some sandwich, and it was alright. Seemed like something I could make though. Overall, avoid this place. I kinda regret not going to Mcdonalds instead.
Generally very crowded, if you can get in to this place, it's not a bad restaurant to grab a bite at after a hard day of shopping. The food, though Mediterranean it says, leans towards Italian. The breads are good, as are the appetizers. Pastas are a hit and miss, but salads are pretty decent. Very loud when crowded and you're practically breathing down your neighbor's neck.
the focaccia bread they gave us when seated were bomb!  buttery and the best i had so far. i had the ahi tuna salad (get it with avocado..yumm)  and my friend had some other salad,i dont remember what it's called but it was great... better than my ahi tuna.
Pizza was pungent & smelled like feet. The lemonade tasted like lime juice and sparkling water. My attempt to make it better by adding packets of Splenda failed.  Uhhh did I miss something or did my waiter eat half my mussels and clams? $19...ripoff
I can give this place only three stars,because they precook their pasta.It doesn't take long to cook pasta for christ sake!It seems Italian but this precook pasta tells you it's Mediterranean.Real Italians and east coast Italians,you can't get your pasta adanti so don't ask and don't get mad.Everyone else,it is nice place with outside tables,warmy atmosphere,cost-well it's in Stanford Mall.The waiters I was very impress with.I had the lamb cut in cubes and served with ribbon type pasta (which was overcook),good seasoning but not great.This place could have gotten a higher rating,because everything else was on the spot.
Their shrimp salad is just incredible. It comes with ten big prawns and an assortment of deliciousness. The contents of the salad are all separate but it's perfect because everything has it's own unique flavor. The black beans were seasoned so nicely and the avocado was fresh and tasty. It was a healthy and filling meal and we all left very satisfied!
I've been to this place twice now,it's a cute little spot but it's kind of overpriced.. also, everytime I've been here it's driven me nuts that they don't serve free refills.. if we're paying $65 dollars for a dinner for 2 & there's not one other couple in the restaurant, I think they could cough up at least 1 FREE REFILL!
I had the goat cheese salad, which was sooo good. The dressing was a really nice vinaigrette that I only wish I had also had my friend's pizza to use the crust to soak the rest up with. The Gorgonzola pizza, by the way, was also delicious. Cute outdoor place, reasonably priced, but just beyond tasty!
always my choice while shopping. good salad, timbalo, pasta, and.. dessert! (best profiterole ever) -1 for lousy service
This was a suprising place to find tucked in the middle of a mall and puts a whole new spin on "mall food".  The food was top-notch and service was good.  The prices were a little high but leaving without any complaints is priceless.
Considering the prices they charge, the food is substandard and the wait staff is somewhat snobbish.  Their hamburger on foccacia is average, caesar salad is bland for $10.95 and chicken al limone was too saucy for my taste.  Unfortunately I have yet to find a place that is more than average to eat at in Stanford Shopping Center.
We've eaten here several times. I usually have the prawn salad, but tonight, tried the Petrale sole meuniere with asparagus and boiled potato. It was cooked to perfection and the sauce was excellent. The asparagus nicely sauteed, one boiled potato, and some zucchini and Roma tomatoes on the side were good. I had to ask for bread, however, and it was pretty boring focaccia bread at that. My husband had the New York steak which was medium rare as requested, and came with lentils, potatoes au gratin, and zucchini. My dinner was $20, his $29. The service was not perfect, but was friendly and we like the atmosphere. We also love sitting outside on the mall when the weather is good.
Came here today because 1. we wanted to get out of the crazy rain and 2. we were hungry. We wanted to try somewhere new and it was a step away. Came in and were seated towards the back. As we walked to our seats i looked around at what others ordered and was pleased to see everyone munching away happily. I ordered the Vegetable soup that comes with a small side of foccacia and my boyfriend got the tuna. My soup was good. They used simple ingredients to make a really delicious soup. It was so good i didnt mind that i burned my mouth form it :D Cost a little bit more than it should have for our food but i guess was worth it. Would come again for the soup and bread for sure.
Food and service are poor and the price is unjustifiable. The prosciutto e melone for $15 was 3 pieces of unripe melon with a piece of store bought prosciutto around each. The pizza crust is too thick and chewy for a real thin crust pizza and the pasta is far from al dente. Our waiter made was inattentive and either clueless or downright rude in the way he addressed us. Will not be going back.
Overpriced for the ambiance and average dishes.  With so many better restaurants in the area you have many better choices.
I went in alone and the guy instantaneously looked at me weird because I was dining alone. Service was inattentive, possibly because I was alone, partly because I probably wasn't dressed like Stanford Faculty, but still presentable. Waiter didn't bother asking if I wanted dessert or filling my glass on a reasonably timely basis.  Were there adequate staff on hand?  I'd say so, enough to check on whether or not I had enough water. All in all, the guy had a smarmy, patronizing tone.  Pretty impressive for someone who wasn't exactly a Rhodes Scholar. I still tipped the guy 20% to prove I was a nice guy, but in retrospect, he didn't deserve a dime. Tipping in this country has gotten out of control.  We have to tip 15% just to tell people the service was bad.  If it was good, then 18% and if it is well above that, then 20% or above. Other places have tip jars. I'm a good tipper most of the time, but it's slowly getting to the point that I'm wondering to myself "WTF?" Why can't restaurants charge more and pay staff more?
We came to this place thinking it was a take out or order and sit down but it was a full service restaurant.  Since we stepped in already we might as well stay.  The food was actually good but a bit pricey.  The pizzas are actually bigger than I expected since it says personal on the menu.  This restaurant got a three stars because the service was horrible.  We were seated for 10 minutes but the waiter didn't give us a menu.  Then another waiter came by and asked if we were ready to order even we had no menus on our hands.  We ordered the roasted mussels (surprisingly good) but there was literally 10 mussels in the bowl.  The pizzas was also not bad, the dough was a bit too crunchy.  I wouldn't come back to this place again though.
This place is overpriced. That being said, the food is amazing. They bake all their bread in house. We had the pear and Gorgonzola salad to begin with which had a perfect amount of dressing and is a large enough portion to share. We accompanied our salad with some delicious home made onion focaccia bread. For our main course, we shared the Mediterranean sea bass that was light and delicious. The owner and his wife were there to oversee the whole operation. They seemed to be very involved with guest satisfaction.
Went in with my girlfriend because I was checking Yelp to see which restaurant was pretty good around the mall and found this place.  They were nice seating us but we didn't get our glass of water until 6 min later.  We have to ask them.  That time, I notice it's because there was only one person severing everyone so I didn't give them a hard time.  then we got our bread and we got different bread then anyone else.  I think it's because we needed to ask for a different one if we want.  The food was very good.  I can't complain about that but when the other severer actually came in to work, they weren't doing their job.  I ask the younger server for more water and he just pretend he didn't hear me and just look at me and walk away.  Then I have to ask an older sever for water, he got it right away.  I don't know if it was that we were asian or that we look young that they wouldn't really sever us that well.  I was kind of mad at the younger severer for not doing their job and that's not the only reason why I gave a low rating.   The bill came out to be 38.11 total and I gave $4 because I didn't feel the service was good.  Then the next day I check my bank statement and I see that they charge me $45.11.  I don't know why they added another $3 but just watch out for that when you eat there.
Our lunch was exquisite.  The melon in the melon-prosciutto dish  just melted in our mouths... ripe yet firm.   The baked goat cheese salad was truly delicious, -- actually worth making a special  trip for.  The pricing is appropriate for the general tenor of the center.  People at our neighboring table were praising their pizza.  The water is delicious unlike most Palo Alto water. We look forward to returning.
Great Food ESPECIALLY the Tiramisu! RIDICULOUS prices so i'll just get my pizza else where and just get a $7 Tiramisu. One star for great tiramisu. Thats the only reason.
To all those geographically-challenged people above like Christine L. & Mona W.  ITALY IS IN THE MEDITERRANEAN - IT IS SURROUNDED BY THE MEDITERRANEAN SEA. I hope you did not graduate from high school and not know that.  This lack of awareness of the world is what makes the US look like idiots. From my experience this restaurant is neither very Italian nor Mediterranean other than pizza and pasta. The fact that the owner is Austrian explains a lot.
